Hawaii statutes.
§88‑95 Withholding of dues and
insurance premiums. A retired member, if the retired member requests in
writing, may have withheld from the retired member's pension, annuity, or
retirement allowance, payments to the employer-union health benefits trust fund
and employee organizations for dues and insurance premiums. [L 1967, c 219, §1;
HRS §88-86; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 54, §1; am L
2006, c 169, §18]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next